sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za predvajalnike MP3: Kompleti dodatkov za predvajalnike MP3 in mobilne telefone; Trakovi za nadlaket za MP3 predvajalnike; Ohišja za predvajalnike MP3; Polnilniki za MP3 predvajalnike; Priključne postaje in stojala za MP3 predvajalnike; Zaščitne folije za zaslone MP3 predvajalnikov; Ovitki in nalepke za MP3 predvajalnike
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Tilbehør til MP3-spillere: Tilbehørssett til MP3-spillere og mobiltelefoner; Armbånd til MP3-spiller; Vesker til MP3-spillere; Ladere til MP3-spiller; Dokker og stativer til MP3-spiller; Skjermbeskyttere til MP3-spiller; Trekk og dekaler til MP3-spiller
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo k MP3 prehrávačom: Súpravy príslušenstva pre MP3 prehrávače a mobilné telefóny; Pažné pásky MP3 prehrávačov; Puzdrá na MP3 prehrávače; Nabíjačky MP3 prehrávačov; Doky a stojany MP3 prehrávačov; Ochranné fólie obrazoviek MP3 prehrávačov; Nálepky a obaly MP3 prehrávačov
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za MP3 playere: Kompleti dodatne opreme za MP3 player i mobitele; Trake za ruku za MP3 player; Kutije za MP3 player; Punjači za MP3 player; Dokovi i stanice za MP3 player; Zaštite za zaslon MP3 playera; Zaštitne naljepnice za MP3 player
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > MP3 přehrávače – příslušenství: Sady příslušenství k MP3 přehrávačům a mobilním telefonům; Pásky na paži pro MP3 přehrávače; Pouzdra na MP3 přehrávače; Nabíječky pro MP3 přehrávače; Doky a stojany pro MP3 přehrávače; Ochranné fólie pro displeje MP3 přehrávačů; Skiny a polepy pro MP3 přehrávače
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > MP3 Player Accessories: MP3 Player & Mobile Phone Accessory Sets; MP3 Player Armbands; MP3 Player Cases; MP3 Player Chargers; MP3 Player Docks & Stands; MP3 Player Screen Protectors; MP3 Player Skins & Decals
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > MP3 Çalar Aksesuarları: MP3 Çalar ve Cep Telefonu Aksesuar Setleri; MP3 Çalar Kol Bantları; MP3 Çalar Kılıfları; MP3 Çalar Şarj Cihazları; MP3 Çalar Dock'ları ve Stantları; MP3 Çalar Ekran Koruyucuları; MP3 Çalar Kaplamalar ve Çıkartmalar
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do odtwarzaczy MP3: Zestawy akcesoriów do odtwarzaczy mp3 i telefonów komórkowych; Opaski na ramię do odtwarzacza MP3; Futerały na odtwarzacze MP3; Ładowarki do odtwarzacza MP3; Postumenty i stojaki do odtwarzacza MP3; Osłony ekranu odtwarzacza MP3; Folia i naklejki do odtwarzacza MP3
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per lettori MP3: Set di accessori per telefoni cellulari e lettori MP3; Fasce da braccio per lettori MP3; Custodie lettori MP3; Caricabatterie per lettori MP3; Docking station e supporti per lettori MP3; Protezioni dello schermo del lettore MP3; Pelli e decalcomanie per lettori MP3
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > MP3播放器配件: MP3 播放器/手机配件套装; MP3 播放器臂带; MP3 播放器保护包; MP3 播放器充电器; MP3 播放器底座/支架; MP3 播放器屏幕保护膜; MP3 播放器贴膜/贴花
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > MP3-lejátszó-kiegészítők: MP3-lejátszó és mobiltelefon-kiegészítőkészletek; MP3-lejátszó-karpántok; MP3-lejátszó-tokok; MP3-lejátszó-töltők; MP3-lejátszó-dokkolók és -állványok; MP3-lejátszó-képernyővédők; MP3-lejátszó-matricák és -dekorok
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > MP3 grotuvų priedai: MP3 grotuvų ir mobiliųjų telefonų priedų rinkiniai; MP3 leistuvės juostynės; MP3 grotuvų dėklai; MP3 leistuvės įkrovikliai; MP3 leistuvės stotys ir stovai; MP3 grotuvo ekrano apsaugos; MP3 grotuvo lipdukų rinkiniai
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ MP3 Player: Σετ αξεσουάρ MP3 player & κινητών τηλεφώνων; Περιβραχιόνια για συσκευές αναπαραγωγής MP3; Θήκες MP3 Player; Φορτιστές συσκευών αναπαραγωγής MP3; Σταθμοί & βάσεις για συσκευές αναπαραγωγής MP3; Προστατευτικά οθόνης για συσκευές αναπαραγωγής MP3; Αυτοκόλλητα & καλύμματα για συσκευές αναπαραγωγής MP3
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para reproductores MP3: Juegos de accesorios para teléfonos móviles y reproductores de MP3; Brazaletes de reproductor MP3; Fundas para reproductores MP3; Cargadores de reproductor MP3; Bases y soportes de reproductor MP3; Protectores de pantalla de reproductor MP3; Skins y calcomanías de reproductor MP3
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > MP3 播放器配件: MP3 播放器/手機配件組; MP3 播放器臂帶; MP3 播放器外殼/護套; MP3 播放器充電器; MP3 播放器座及架; MP3 播放器螢幕保護膜; MP3 播放器貼膜及貼花
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Zubehör für MP3-Player: Zubehörsets für MP3-Player & Mobiltelefone; MP3-Player-Armbänder; MP3-Player-Taschen; MP3-Player-Ladegeräte; MP3-Player-Dockingstationen und -Ständer; MP3-Player-Bildschirmschutzfolien; MP3-Player-Skins und -Aufkleber
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para MP3 player: Conjuntos de acessórios para aparelhos celulares e MP3 players; Braçadeiras para MP3 players; Estojos para MP3 player; Carregadores para MP3 players; Docks e suportes para MP3 players; Películas protetoras de tela para MP3 players; Capas e adesivos para MP3 players
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для MP3-плееров: Наборы аксессуаров для MP3-плееров и мобильных телефонов; Нарукавные повязки для MP3-плееров; Чехлы для MP3-плееров; Зарядные устройства для MP3-плееров; Док-станции и подставки для MP3-плееров; Защитные пленки для экранов MP3-плееров; Наклейки и декали для MP3-плееров
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour lecteurs MP3: Accessoires pour lecteurs MP3 et téléphones portables; Brassards pour lecteurs MP3; Housses pour lecteurs MP3; Chargeurs pour lecteurs MP3; Stations d’accueil et supports pour lecteurs MP3; Protections d’écran pour lecteurs MP3; Habillages et autocollants pour lecteurs MP3
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de leitor de MP3: Conjuntos de acessórios de leitor de MP3 e telemóvel; Braçadeiras para leitores MP3; Estojos de leitor de MP3; Carregadores para leitores MP3; Bases e suportes para leitores MP3; Películas protetoras de ecrã para leitores MP3; Skins e autocolantes para leitores MP3
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii pentru player MP3: Seturi de accesorii pentru player MP3 și telefon mobil; Banderole pentru playere MP3; Huse pentru playere MP3; Încărcătoare pentru playere MP3; Docuri și suporturi pentru playere MP3; Protectoare de ecran pentru playere MP3; Skinuri și autocolante pentru playere MP3
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện máy nghe nhạc mp3: Bộ phụ kiện máy nghe nhạc MP3 và điện thoại di động; Dải đeo cánh tay máy phát MP3; Túi đựng máy nghe nhạc MP3; Sạc máy phát MP3; Bến và giá máy phát MP3; Tấm bảo vệ màn hình máy phát MP3; Da và decal máy phát MP3
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเล่น MP3: ชุดเครื่องเล่น MP3 และอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับโทรศัพท์เคลื่อนที่; ปลอกแขนสำหรับเครื่องเล่น MP3; ที่ใส่เครื่องเล่น MP3; ที่ชาร์จเครื่องเล่น MP3; ฐานวางและขาตั้งเครื่องเล่น MP3; ฟิล์มกันรอยหน้าจอเครื่องเล่น MP3; สติกเกอร์และแผ่นหุ้มเครื่องเล่น MP3
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > MP3-afspiller – tilbehør: Tilbehørssæt til MP3-afspillere og mobiltelefoner; MP3 afspiller – armbånd; MP3-afspiller – cover; MP3-afspiller – opladere; MP3-afspiller – docks og stativer; MP3-afspiller – skærmbeskyttere; MP3-afspiller – skins og mærkater
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > MP3-soittimen lisätarvikkeet: MP3-soittimen ja matkapuhelimen tarvikesetit; MP3-soittimen käsivarsinauha; MP3-soittimen kotelot; MP3-soittimen laturi; MP3-soittimen telakka ja tuki; MP3-soittimen näytönsuoja; MP3-soittimen suoja ja tarra
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Accessoires voor mp3-spelers: Accessoiresets voor mp3-spelers en mobiele telefoons; MP3-speler armbanden; Hoezen voor mp3-spelers; MP3-speler opladers; MP3-speler docks en standaards; MP3-speler schermbeschermers; MP3-speler skins en stickers
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за MP3 плейъри: Комплекти аксесоари за MP3 плейъри и мобилни телефони; Ленти за ръка за MP3 плейър; Калъфи за MP3 плейъри; Зарядни устройства за MP3 плейър; Докинг станции и стойки за MP3 плейър; Защитни фолиа за екран на MP3 плейър; Облепки и стикери за MP3 плейър
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Tillbehör till MP3-spelare: Tillbehörsset för MP3-spelare och mobiltelefoner; Armband till mp3-spelare; Fodral till MP3-spelare; Laddare till mp3-spelare; Dockor och stativ till mp3-spelare; Skärmskydd till mp3-spelare; Skal och dekaler till mp3-spelare
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > MP3 플레이어 부대용품: MP3 플레이어/휴대전화 부대용품 세트; MP3 플레이어 암밴드; MP3 플레이어 케이스; MP3 플레이어 충전기; MP3 플레이어 독 및 스탠드; MP3 플레이어 화면 보호 필름; MP3 플레이어 스킨 및 데칼
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > MP3プレーヤーアクセサリー: MP3プレーヤー・携帯電話アクセサリーセット; MP3プレーヤー用アームバンド; MP3プレーヤーケース; MP3プレーヤー充電器; MP3プレーヤードック・スタンド; MP3プレーヤー画面保護フィルム; MP3プレーヤースキン・デカール